Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0664.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. (1) As used in this section and sections 2a and 2b: (a) "Agricultural processing" means 1 or more of the operations that transform, package, sort, or grade livestock or livestock products, agricultural commodities, or plant or plant products into goods that are used for the intermediate or final consumption including goods for nonfood use. (b) "Commercialization" means the transition from research to the actions necessary to achieve market entry and general market competitiveness of new innovative technologies, processes, and products and the services that support, assist, equip, finance, or promote a person or an entity with that transition. (c) "Department" means the Michigan department of agriculture and rural development. (d) "Eligible grantee" means a person able to receive a grant under this section and includes, but is not limited to, individuals, farmer owned cooperatives, partnerships, limited liability companies, private or public corporations, and local units of government. (e) "Fund" means the agricultural development fund created in section 2a. (f) "Joint evaluation committee" means a committee selected by the commission of agriculture and rural development with appropriate expertise to conduct an independent, unbiased, objective, and competitive evaluation of grant proposals. The committee shall include at least 3 producers, including 1 plant agricultural producer, 1 animal agricultural producer, and another producer at large, an individual with a scientific agriculture education, and an agricultural financial lender. (g) "Qualified agricultural loan" means a loan for projects designed to establish, retain, attract, or develop value-added agricultural processing and related agricultural production operations in this state. (h) "Specialty crops" means any agricultural commodity except wheat, feed grains, oil seeds, cotton, rice, peanuts, and tobacco, as well as products derived from these agricultural commodities. (i) "Value-added" means the enhancement or improvement of the overall value of an agricultural commodity or of an animal or plant product into a product of higher value. The enhancement or improvement includes, but is not limited to, marketing, agricultural processing, transforming, or packaging. (2) The department shall establish and administer an agricultural value-added grant program. The commission of agriculture and rural development shall award grants from the fund created in section 2a only for projects designed to establish, retain, expand, attract, or develop value-added agricultural processing and related agricultural production operations in this state. In approving a grant under this subsection, the commission of agriculture and rural development shall state the specific objective reasons supporting the selection of the applicant over competing applicants. The joint evaluation committee shall assist and provide recommendations to the commission of agriculture in identifying high-quality projects for funding based upon the selection criteria and scoring system approved by the commission of agriculture. The recommendations shall must include all materials and decision documents used by the joint evaluation committee in making the recommendations. (3) All scoring sheets, meetings, and other decisions made by the joint evaluation committee shall be open to the public and considered public documents. A record or portion of a record, material, or other data received, prepared, used, or retained by the department in connection with an application to or with a project or product assisted by the department or with an award, grant, loan, or investment relating to financial or proprietary information submitted by the applicant that is considered by the applicant and acknowledged by the department as confidential shall is not be subject to the disclosure requirements of the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (4) Subject to subsection (2), the department shall do all of the following: (a) Establish a competitive process to award grants. The competitive process shall must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (i) A provision that the applications must be reviewed by the joint evaluation committee. Scientific and technical merit, commercial merit, and the ability to leverage additional funding shall must be given equal weight in the review and scoring process. (ii) A preference for proposals that demonstrate a high level of innovation for value-added agricultural processing and related agricultural production ventures to benefit producers in this state. (iii) A preference for proposals that are attempting to secure a license for agricultural-related intellectual property to be produced in Michigan.this state. (iv) A provision that the program will utilize contracts with measurable milestones, clear objectives, and provisions to revoke awards for breach of contract. (v) Provide for a cash match of at least not less than 10% of the grant by the applicant. (vi) Limit overhead rates for recipients of grants to reflect actual overhead but not greater than 15% of the grant. (vii) A preference for proposals whose business plan forecasts revenues within 2 years or that have outside investments from investors with experience and management teams with experience in the area targeted by the proposal, or both. (b) Prepare a request for proposals on at least an annual basis for grants for eligible grantees from the fund. Grants are contingent upon the availability of funds. (5) Subject to subsection (4)(a)(i), an application for a grant submitted under this section shall must be evaluated and ranked according to selection criteria and a scoring or point system approved by the director of the department. The selection criteria and the scoring or point system shall must be reviewed and approved by the commission of agriculture and rural development. In developing such a the scoring or point system, the department shall seek the assistance of the Michigan economic development corporation, bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, any institution of higher education, the United States department of agriculture?rural development agency, Department of Agriculture Rural Development agency, the rural development council of Michigan Rural Development Council, agricultural producers, and other industry and professional organizations as determined by the director of the department. (6) The commission of agriculture and rural development shall ensure that a recipient of a grant under this section agrees that, as a condition of receiving the grant, that recipient shall not use the money for the development of a casino regulated under the Michigan gaming control and revenue act, the Initiated Law of 1996, Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226, a casino regulated under the Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497, 102 Stat. 2467, or any other gaming enterprise. (7) The department, in cooperation with the department of treasury and Michigan financial institutions, shall establish a low-interest loan program in a manner similar to the qualified agricultural loan program established in section 2a of 1855 PA 105, MCL 21.142a, or a loan guarantee program to provide qualified agricultural loans. The department of treasury shall give the department any necessary assistance required to establish a low-interest loan or loan guarantee program. The department shall work with Michigan financial institutions to establish a certification system to verify that loan applicants are requesting qualified agricultural loans. As part of the low-interest loan program, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Work with the department of treasury to establish agreements with participating financial institutions. (b) Ensure that an investment or new investment utilizing the 21st century jobs fund in which a qualified agricultural loan is attributed is not made pursuant to under this section after June 1, 2008. (c) Ensure that the terms of a qualified agricultural loan under this section are provide that the qualified agricultural loan be for a term of not more than 5 years and that the recipient must make the first payment made by the recipient occurs not later than 24 months after the date of the loan. (d) Ensure that the interest rate charged by participating financial institutions does not exceed 50% of prime in Michigan this state plus 1%. (e) Ensure that participating financial institutions do not refinance prior debt. (f) Require a participating financial institution to certify compliance with the Sarbanes-Oxley act of 2002, Public Law 107-204, or prohibit an officer, director, or principal shareholder of a participating financial institution, or his or her immediate family members, from receiving an agricultural value-added low-interest loan from the financial institution. (g) Require the recipient of a qualified agricultural loan under this section to agree that, as a condition of receiving the loan, that the recipient shall not use the money for the development of a casino regulated under the Michigan gaming control and revenue act, the Initiated Law of 1996, Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226, a casino regulated under the Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497, 102 Stat. 2467, or any other gaming enterprise. (8) As part of a loan guarantee program, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Work with the department of treasury to establish agreements with participating financial institutions. (b) Ensure that participating financial institutions require adequate collateral and fully liquidate all collateral before calling on the loan guarantees. (c) Establish a loan guarantee of not more than 90% of the financial institution's loss after all alternatives to collect have been exhausted. (d) Ensure that participating financial institutions do not refinance prior debt. (e) Require a participating financial institution to certify compliance with the Sarbanes-Oxley act of 2002, Public Law 107-204, or prohibit an officer, director, or principal shareholder of a participating financial institution, or his or her immediate family members, from receiving an agricultural value-added loan guarantee from the financial institution. (f) Require the recipient of a qualified agricultural loan under this section to agree that, as a condition of receiving the loan guarantee, that the recipient shall not use the money for the development of a casino regulated under the Michigan gaming control and revenue act, the Initiated Law of 1996, Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226, a casino regulated under the Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497, 102 Stat. 2467, or any other gaming enterprise. (g) Maintain a list of financial institutions that will participate in the loan guarantee program. (9) The director of the department may impose fiduciary obligations upon a recipient of a grant, including performance bonding, and may impose conditions upon on the receipt and expenditure of the grant money. (10) Notwithstanding section 3(1) of 1968 PA 317, MCL 15.323, members of the commission of agriculture and rural development and the joint evaluation committee are subject to 1968 PA 317, MCL 15.321 to 15.330. As used in this subsection, "substantial conflict of interest" means that the pecuniary interest is of such importance as to either materially influence the judgment of the member in the actual performance of his or her duty under the act or to foreseeably and materially influence the judgment of a reasonable person with similar knowledge and experience acting under similar circumstances and in a like position as the member. For purposes of this section, members of the commission of agriculture and rural development and the joint evaluation committee shall do the following: (a) Discharge the duties of the position in a nonpartisan manner, in good faith, in the best interests of this state, and with the degree of diligence, care, and skill that a fiduciary would exercise under similar circumstances in a like position. In discharging duties of the office, the commission of agriculture and rural development when acting in good faith may rely upon on the report of the joint evaluation committee or upon on financial statements of the department represented to the commission of agriculture by the officer having charge of its books or accounts or stated in a written report by the auditor general. (b) Not make or participate in making, or in any way attempt to use his or her position to influence a matter before the department regarding, a loan, loan guarantee, grant, or other expenditure under this act. (c) Not have any financial interest in a recipient of proceeds under this act and shall not engage in any conduct that constitutes a substantial conflict of interest. (d) Immediately advise the commission of agriculture and rural development in writing of the details of any incident or circumstances that may present the existence of a substantial conflict of interest with respect to the performance of his or her duty under this act. (e) Disclose a substantial conflict of interest related to any matter before the department or the commission of agriculture and rural development takes any action with respect to the matter, which disclosure shall must become a part of the record of the official proceedings. (f) Refrain from doing all of the following with respect to the matter that is a basis of a substantial conflict of interest: (i) Voting in the proceedings related to the matter. (ii) Participating in the discussion or deliberation of the matter. (iii) Being present at the meeting when the discussion, deliberation, and voting on the matter takes place. (iv) Discussing the matter with any other member of the commission of agriculture or the joint evaluation committee. (11) An application for a grant from the fund shall must be made on a form or format prescribed by the department. The department may require the applicant to provide information reasonably necessary to allow the department to make a determination required under this section. (12) The department shall promulgate rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, to implement this section. (13) The amendatory act that added subsection (5) shall 2006 PA 423 does not affect any grants awarded under this act prior to the effective date of the amendatory act that added subsection (5).before September 29, 2006. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.